Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3526
Resolution; hearing; notice; objections; procedure.

(1) Notice of the time and place, which place shall be in the city or village where the community improvement district is organized, when any resolution proposed under section 18-3525 shall be set for consideration before the board of trustees or the administrator, shall be given the same day each week two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the city or village where the community improvement district was organized, which publication shall contain the entire wording of the proposed resolution. The last publication shall not be less than five days nor more than two weeks prior to the time set for hearing on objections to the adoption of any such proposed resolution, at which hearing the owners of the property which might become subject to assessment for the contemplated improvement may appear and make objections to the proposed improvement. Thereupon the resolution may be amended and adopted or adopted as proposed.

(2) If a petition opposing the proposed resolution, signed by property owners representing a majority of the front footage which may become subject to assessment for the cost of any improvements as set forth by the proposed resolution, is filed with the clerk of the community improvement district within three days before the date of the meeting for the hearing on such proposed resolution, such proposed resolution shall not be adopted.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 26.
April 17, 2026